Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-426
Psychiatric or mental hospital, defined.

Psychiatric or mental hospital means a hospital that provides psychiatric services on an inpatient or outpatient basis to persons who have a mental disease, disorder, or disability.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 26.